<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89126-0024 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.1-26-89.f2.A1023</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="52">42 CFR Parts 405, 410, 412, 413, and 482</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[BERC-423-P]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Medicare Program; Fee Schedules for the Services of Certified RegisteredNurse Anesthetists</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Health Care Financing Administration (HCFA), HHS.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Proposed rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>We are proposing to revise the Medicare regulations toallow certified registered nurse anesthetists (CRNAs) to receive Medicarepayment for the anesthesia services and related care they furnish. In addition,this proposed rule sets forth the fee schedules that would be used to makepayment for the services of CRNAs, except for the services of CRNAs incertain rural hospitals, which would be paid on a reasonable cost basis.This proposal, which would be effective for services furnished on or afterJanuary 1, 1989, would implement section 9320 of the Omnibus Budget ReconciliationAct of 1986, as amended by section 4084 of the Omnibus Budget ReconciliationAct of 1986, as amended by section 4084 of the Omnibus Budget ReconciliationAct of 1987, section 411(i)(3) of the Medicare Catastrophic Coverage Actof 1988, and section 608(c) of the Family Support Act of 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATE: </T2>Comments will be considered if we receive them at the appropriateaddress, as provided below, no later than 5:00 p.m. on March 27, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Mail comments to the following address: Health Care FinancingAdministration, Department of Health and Human Services, Attention: BERC-423-P,P.O. Box 28676, Baltimore, Maryland 21207.If you prefer, you may deliver your comments to one of the following addresses:Room 309-G, Hubert H. Humphrey Building, 200 Independence Ave., SW., Washington,DC.Room 132, East High Rise Building, 6325 Security Boulevard, Baltimore,Maryland.When commenting, please refer to file code BERC-423-P. Comments receivedtimely will be available for public inspection as they are received, generallybeginning approximately three weeks after publication of a document, inRoom 309-G of the Department's offices at 200 Independence Ave., SW., Washington,DC on Monday through Friday of each week from 8:30 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. (phone202-245-7890).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>James Menas, (301) 966-4507, CRNAFee Schedules.George Morey, (301) 966-4653, Definition of CRNA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background</ITAG>Under the current regulations, which are located at 42 CFR 405.552 and405.553, anesthesiology services personally furnished by a physician arepaid on a reasonable charge basis under Part B of the Medicare program(Supplementary Medical Insurance). In addition, payment may also be madeon a reasonable charge basis for the personal medical direction that aphysician furnishes to a certified registered nurse anesthetist (CRNA).If the physician directs an anesthesia procedure that involves a CRNA whois employed by the physician, the reasonable charge is determined as theleast of the physician's customary charge conversion factor, the prevailingcharge conversion factor, each of which is multiplied by the number ofallowable units, or the physician's actual charge. The number of allowableunits is the sum of the base units assigned to the anesthesia procedure,time units that represent the elapsed time of the anesthesia procedure(limited to no more than one time unit for each 15 minutes of anesthesiatime) and modifier units that take into account special factors, such asthe age or physical condition of the patient, if the physician bills andthe carrier recognizes modifier units.If a physician furnishes medical direction on an anesthesia procedure thatinvolves a CRNA who is not employed by the physician, the reasonable chargeis also determined as the least of the physician's customary charge conversionfactor, the prevailing charge conversion factor, each of which is multipliedby the number of allowable units, or the physician's actual charge. However,in these cases, the number of allowable units is the sum of the base unitsassigned to the anesthesia procedure, time units, which are limited tono more than one time unit for each 30 minutes of anesthesia time, andmodifier units, if the physician bills and the carrier recognizes modifierunits.When the CRNA is not employed by the physician, the cost of the CRNA'sservices is reimbursed to the hospital on a reasonable cost basis for anesthesiaservices furnished to hospital inpatients or outpatients or to the ambulatorysurgical center (ASC) as part of the facility fee for anesthesia servicesfurnished to ASC patients. Thus, the difference in Medicare payment tothe physician between a medically-directed anesthesia procedure involvinga CRNA who is the physician's employee and a medically-directed anesthesiaprocedure involving a CRNA who is not the physician's employee is two timeunits per hour multiplied by the appropriate conversion factor. Therefore,although the CRNA service is not identified separately on a physician'sbill or claim, our current policy estimates the Part B payment for a CRNA'sservice at two time units per hour multiplied by the appropriate conversionfactor.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Summary of New Legislation</ITAG>On October 21, 1986, the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1986 (Pub.L. 99-509) was enacted. The provisions of section 9320 of Pub. L. 99-509made the following changes (which are reflected in sections 1832(a)(2)(B),1833(a)(1)(H) and (1), and 1861(s)(11) and (bb) of the Social SecurityAct (the Act)) that affect Medicare payment for the services of nurse anesthetists:andbullet; Effective with services furnished on or after January 1, 1989,direct reimbursement is provided for anesthesia services and related carefurnished by CRNAs, subject to State licensure and nurse anesthetist certifyingbody requirements. andbullet; Medicare pays 80 percent of the lesser of the actual charge orthe fee schedule amount for anesthesia services and related care afterthe Part B deductible has been met. Assignment is mandatory in order forCRNAs to receive payment for these services, and violators are subjectto civil monetary penalties. andbullet; The Secretary is directed to establish a fee schedule for CRNAservices, using a system of time units, a system of base and time units,or any other appropriate methodology. The initial fee schedule must bebased on audited data from cost reporting periods ending in Federal fiscalyear (FY) 1985, and must be adjusted annually by the percentage increasein the Medicare Economic Index, in order to be effective on January 1stof each year. The fee schedule can be national or adjusted for geographicareas. andbullet; No hospital that presents a claim or request for payment for servicesof a CRNA may treat any uncollected coinsurance amount imposed with respectto such services as a bad debt of the hospital. andbullet; The reasonable cost pass-through provision ends effective forCRNA services furnished to hospital inpatients after December 31, 1988.andbullet; The initial fee schedule must be set so that total payment forCRNA services, plus the applicable coinsurance in FY 1989, equals estimatedtotal amounts that would have been paid in 1989 if the services were includedas inpatient hospital services. The Secretary is also directed to adjustphysician charges for medical direction or the fee schedule amounts, orboth, to ensure that total payments plus coinsurance for all these servicesin 1989 and 1990 do not exceed the amounts that would have been paid absentthis legislation. If this results in reductions in physician reasonablecharges, a nonparticipating physician may not charge more than 125 percentof the reduced prevailing charge plus (in the first year) half the differencebetween his or her actual charge in the previous year and 125 percent ofthe reduced prevailing charge. Violators are subject to sanctions. In addition, section 9320 of Pub. L. 99-509 added a new paragraph (11)to section 1861(s) of the Act to provide specifically that ``services ofa certified registered anesthetist (as defined in subsection (bb))'' areamong the medical and other health services that are covered under PartB of Medicare. Section 1861(bb)(1) of the Act states that ``services ofa certified registered nurse anesthetist'' means anesthesia services andrelated care, furnished by a CRNA, that the nurse anesthetist is authorizedto perform as such by the State in which the services are furnished. Section1861(bb)(2) of the Act states that the term ``CRNA'' means a CRNA licensedby the State who meets such education, training, and other requirementsrelating to anesthesia services and related care as the Secretary may prescribe.Section 1861(bb)(2) of the Act further authorizes the Secretary, in prescribingthese requirements, to use the same requirements as those established bya national organization for the certification of nurse anesthetists. On December 22, 1987, the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1987 (Pub.L. 100-203) was enacted. The provisions of section 4084 of Pub. L. 100-203,which amended sections 1833 (l)(2) and (l)(5)(A) of the Act, made the followingchanges to the CRNA fee schedule legislation established by section 9320of Pub. L. 99-509: andbullet; The initial fee schedule could be developed from ``other dataas the Secretary determines necessary'' in addition to using FY 1985 costreport data. andbullet; The CRNA payment based on the fee schedule can be made to an ambulatorysurgical center as well as the CRNA, the hospital, or physician group.In addition to the changes made by section 4084 of Pub. L. 100-203, section4048(a) of Pub. L. 100-203 amended section 1842(b) of the Act to providethat in determining the reasonable charge of a physician for medical directionof two or more CRNAs for anesthesia services furnished on or after April1, 1988 and before January 1, 1991, the number of base units recognizedfor each concurrent procedure is reduced by_ andbullet; Ten percent, in the case of medical direction of two CRNAs; andbullet; Twenty-five percent, in the case of medical direction of threeCRNAs; andandbullet; Forty percent, in the case of medical direction of four CRNAs.On July 1, 1988, the Medicare Catastrophic Coverage Act of 1988 (Pub. L.100-360) was enacted. Section 411(i)(3) of Pub. L. 100-360 made technicalamendments to section 4084 of Pub. L. 100-203 to provide that_andbullet; The term ``CRNA,'' as prescribed by the Secretary, also includesan anesthesiologist assistant (section 1861(bb)(2) of the Act); andandbullet; With respect to CRNA services, the amounts paid would be 80 percentof the least of the__Actual charge;_Prevailing charge that would be recognized if the services had been performedby an anesthesiologist; or_Fee schedule amount (section 1833(a)(1)(H) of the Act).On October 13, 1988, the family Support Act of 1988 (Pub. L. 100-485) wasenacted. Section 608(c) of Pub. L. 100-485 amended section 9320 of Pub.L. 99-509 to allow certain hospitals that are located in a rural area (asdefined for purposes of section 1886(d) of the Act) to continue to be reimbursedon a reasonale cost basis for CRNA services during calendar years 1989,1990, and 1991.To qualify in 1989, a rural hospital must establish before April 1, 1989to the satisfaction of the Secretary that_andbullet; It employed or contracted with a CRNA but not more than one full-timeequivalent CRNA as of January 1, 1988;andbullet; It had a volume of 250 or fewer surgical procedures, includinginpatient and outpatient procedures, requiring anesthesia in calendar year1987; andandbullet; Each CRNA employed by or under contract with the hospital hasagreed not to bill under Medicare Part B for professional services furnishedat the hospital.To qualify in 1990 or 1991, a rural hospital must establish before thebeginning of the calendar year that in the prior year it did not furnishmore than 250 surgical procedures including inpatient and outpatient proceduresrequiring anesthesia services.These provisions are to be implemented so as to maintain budget neutralityconsistent with section 1833(1)(3) of the Act.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Provisions of this Proposed Rule</ITAG>A. Services of a CRNA or an Anesthesiologist AssistantTo implement the provisions of sections 1861(s)(11) and (bb) of the Act,we are proposing to make two changes in the regulations on coverage ofmedical and other health services in 42 CFR Part 401, Subpart B. Specifically,we are planning to revise andSection; 410.10 by adding ``services of a CRNAor an anesthesiologist assistant'' to the list of medical and other healthservices in that section. In additon, we are proposing to add a new andSection;410.66 to define the terms ``CRNA'', ``anesthesiologist assistant,'' and``anesthetist.''We are proposing to define ``CRNA'' as a registered nurse who is licensedas a professional registered nurse by the State in which he or she practices,and either_andbullet; Is currently certified by either the Council on Certificationof Nurse Anesthetists or the Council on Recertification of Nurse Anesthetists;orandbullet; Has graduated within the past 18 months from a nurse anesthesiaprogram that meets the standards of the Council on Accreditation of NurseAnesthesia Educational Programs and is awaiting initial certification.This definition relies on certification by either of the two nationallyrecognized certifying bodies for nurse anesthetists, and thus reflectsthe provision of section 1861(bb) of the Act that authorizes the use ofrequirements established by a national organization for the certificationof nurse anesthetists. Although we are proposing this definition of CRNA, we recognize that thereare other interpretations of section 1861(bb) of the Act which, if adopted,would require use of a more restrictive definition of that term. In particular,the phrase ``certified registered nurse anesthetist licensed by the State''in section 1861(bb)(2) of the Act could be read to mean that the anesthetistmust be licensed by the State <T3>as a CRNA </T3>rather than only as a registered nurse. Moreover, thestatutory reference to a <T3>certified </T3>registered nurse anesthetist could be interpreted toexclude from the definition those persons who are not actually certified.Such an interpretation would not, for example, allow nurse anesthetistswho have completed the CRNA training but have not passed the required certificationexamination to be classified as CRNAs for Medicare purposes. While we considered use of the more restrictive definition of CRNA, weare not now proposing to adopt it. We believe use of this definition wouldbe inconsistent with the intent of Congress in enacting section 1861(bb)of the Act and with current anesthesia practice. With respect to the issueof licensure, our information indicates that fewer than 10 States currentlylicense CRNAs as such. The remaining States license registered nurses andeither employ one of a variety of means to officially sanction the practiceof anesthesia by a nonphysician or have no formal process by which theyauthorize nurses to give anesthesia. If we were to require CRNAs to belicensed as such by the State, individuals who are now functioning as CRNAsbut practice in States that do not specifically license CRNAs could notbe considered CRNAs under Medicare and would not be permitted to administeranesthesia in Medicare participating hospitals and ASCs. We doubt thatCongress intended section 1861(bb) of the Act to achieve this result. Thus,with respect to licensure, we are proposing to require only that the individualbe licensed as a professional registered nurse by the State in which heor she practices or meet any other licensure requirement the State imposeswith respect to nonphysician anesthetists. With regard to the second issue, we believe it is permissible under section1861(bb) of the Act for individuals to be considered CRNAs under Medicareeven if they are in fact not certified. Several considerations persuadedus not to propose a definition of CRNA based on an interpretation of thelaw requiring actual certfication. First, we have been advised that theCouncil on Certification of Nurse Anesthetists recognizes as ``certification-eligible''those registered nurses who have graduated within the past 24 months froma nurse anesthesia program that meets the Council's standards, but havenot yet passed the required certification examination. We also note thatthe Joint Commission on Accreditation of Healthcare Organizations (JCAHO)accreditation standards permit certification-eligible nurse anesthetiststo furnish services under the same degree of supervision as CRNAs. It wasalso stated to us that the laws of many States permit certification-eligiblenurse anesthetists to function as CRNAs for specified time periods, usuallyranging between 12 and 24 months in length. If we were to adopt a definition of CRNA that excluded certification-eligiblenurse anesthetists, we would be establishing a definition that is inconsistentwith existing practice in the nursing profession, with the standards ofthe JCAHO, and with the nurse practice acts of many States. There is noindication in the legislative history of 1861(bb) of the Act that Congressspecifically intended such an inconsistency. Therefore, we are proposingto recognize certification-eligible nurse anesthetists as CRNAs for a periodof 18 months following their graduation from an approved nurse anesthesiaprogram. Because of the existence of alternative interpretations of section 1861(bb)of the Act, we are particularly interested in receiving public commenton which interpretation should be followed in the implementing regulations.We are proposing to define an ``anesthesiologist assistant'' as an individualwho is permitted by State law to administer anesthesia and has successfullycompleted a six-year program for anesthesiologist assistants, two yearsof which consist of specialized academic and clinical training in anesthesiaand who is under the direct supervision of an anesthesiologist who is physicallypresent. This definition is the same as that currently set forth in theMedicare conditions of participation for hospitals at andSection; 482.52(a)(5).To ensure that these definitions are applied consistently, we would reviseandSection; 482.52 (a)(4) and (a)(5) to reflect the addition of the new andSection;410.66. In addition, we are proposing to define the term ``anesthetist'' to includeboth anesthesiologist assistants and CRNAs. The use of this term representsa clear and convenient means of referring to both types of practitioners.B. General Method of Payment Effective with services furnished on or after January 1, 1989, as requiredby section 1833(a)(1)(H) of the Act, payment for the services of a CRNAis made, after the Part B deductible has been met, at 80 percent of theleast of the_ andbullet; Actual charge; andbullet; Prevailing charge that would be recognized if the services hadbeen performed by an anesthesiologist; or andbullet; Fee schedule amount. C. Development of a Fee Schedule <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Background </ITAG>Section 1833(l)(1) of the Act requires the Secretary to establish a feeschedule for the services of CRNAs. In establishing the fee schedule, section1833(l)(4) of the Act provides that the Secretary may use a system of timeunits, a system of base and time units, or any appropriate methodology.The Secretary may also establish a nationwide fee schedule or adjust thefee schedule for geographic areas. In addition, under section 1833(l)(3)(A) of the Act, the initial fee scheduleis to be established in such a way as to ensure that the estimated totalamount paid under the fee schedule, plus the applicable coinsurance amounts,will be equal to the amount that would have been paid had the servicesbeen included as inpatient hospital services. Furthermore, section 1833(l)(3)(B)of the Act provides that the Secretary must reduce the prevailing chargesof physicians for medical direction of CRNAs, or the fee schedule amount,or both, to the extent necessary to ensure that the estimated total amountthat will be paid, plus the applicable coinsurance amounts, will not exceedthe total amount that would have been paid absent this provision. Thislimitation is needed because physicians who employ CRNAs have been reimbursedfor CRNA services through the reasonable charge allowance, and effectiveJanuary 1, 1989, payment for all CRNA services will be through the feeschedule. Since the amounts paid on a per service basis to physicians forthe CRNAs they employ are generally less than the amounts recognized asinpatient hospital costs, this adjustment is needed to ensure that we donot pay more under the CRNA fee schedule than we would have paid absentthe new provision.The difference in Medicare payment between the hospital-employed and physician-employedCRNAs is due primarily to the different payment methodologies. The hospitalis reimbursed for CRNA services on a reasonable cost basis, which is relatedto the actual cost of the services. CRNAs who are employed and medicallydirected by anesthesiologists are paid as part of the physician's reasonablecharge payment. Since fiscal year 1973, physicians' reasonable charge paymentshave been constrained by the Medicare economic index. Moreover, the basicmethod of paying physicians for their CRNA costs (that is, recognizingtwo additional time units per hour) was not established based on a statisticalanalysis of CRNA salary costs.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Structure and Geographic Basis for Fee Schedules</ITAG>In determining the basic framework for the fee schedule, we believe thatit is desirable to construct a system similar to that used for anesthesiologists(that is, a system based on time and base units). Since we are proposingto establish a uniform relative value guide for anesthesia services (seethe proposed rule published elsewhere in this issue of the <T4>Federal Register</T4>), as required by section 4048 of Pub. L. 100-203,under which we are also proposing to eliminate modifier units, we are alsoproposing not to recognize modifier units in determining payments for CRNAservices. We believe that use of the same type of system for anesthesiaservices furnished by CRNAs and anesthesiologists would be simpler forcarriers to administer. Thus, the CRNA fee schedule payment would be determinedby multiplying an appropriate conversion factor by the sum of the baseunit for the anesthesia procedure and the time units. For CRNAs, one timeunit would be allowed for each 15 minutes of anesthesia time.As noted in the proposed rule on a uniform relative value guide for anesthesiaservices, it is our intention (subject to publication of another proposedrule) to eliminate the separate time unit element of the anesthesia paymentsystem within two years of the effective date of the final rule implementingthat guide. We are also considering alternatives discussed in the proposedrule on a uniform relative value guide for anesthesia services furnishedby physicians, which would limit the potential for inappropriate use oftime units for billing purposes. The elimination of time units will bethe subject of a separate proposed rulemaking document and comments submittedin response to that proposed rule will, of course, be carefully consideredat that time.Our current policy on recognizing time units as a component of paymentfor physician anesthesia services was the focus of a recent study conductedby the Office of the Inspector General (OIG). (Copies of this report entitled``Medicare Part B Payments for Unexpended Physician Efforts Relating toAnesthesia Services'' (A-07-88-00080 issued on August 9, 1988) can be obtainedby writing to the Office of the Inspector General, 330 Independence AvenueSW, Washington, DC 20201.) Based on the study, OIG recommended the followingoptions to change the current time policy:andbullet; Pay for actual time expended, rather than treating all fractionalunits as whole units. That is, 65 minutes would equal four and one-thirdtime units instead of five units.andbullet; Round all fractional units down to the next lower whole unit.That is, disregard all fractional time units (for example, any amount oftime between 61 and 74 minutes would equal four units instead of five units).Another alternative considered by OIG that would make anesthesia paymentsmore commensurate with the effort expended would be to pay only for thosefractional units in excess of one-half as whole units. That is, any fractionequal to or less than one-half time unit (seven and one-half minutes) wouldbe disregarded (for example, 65 minutes would equal four units, but 68minutes would equal five units).We are proposing to structure the CRNA fee schedule on an individual State-levelbasis because there are significant differences among States in terms ofCRNA salaries and malpractice rates. Using a national or regional fee schedulecould cause an unnecessary redistribution of payments. We considered establishingCRNA payment rates by carrier locality. However, we do not have data availableon CRNA payment rates on a county-wide basis that would allow constructionof payment rates by locality. Thus, we are proposing payment levels ona State-level basis.We note that there are significant differences in payment rates of hospital-employedCRNAs depending on whether they are medically directed by an anesthesiologistor working under the general supervision of the surgeon. As a result, webelieve it is appropriate to construct separate fee schedules for CRNAsworking under the medical direction of an anesthesiologist and for CRNAsworking only under the general supervision of the surgeon. This lattergroup of CRNAs have more responsibility and higher average earnings thanCRNAs working with medical direction. Thus, we believe it is appropriateto compute the rates separately on the basis of whether or not the CRNAis medically directed.Based on the American Association of Nurse Anesthetists' (AANA's) annualmembership survey, we estimate that there are approximately 16,000 CRNAsin full-time practice of the 21,000 CRNAs registered with AANA. Of thefull-time CRNAs, about 45 percent are employed by hospitals or universities,36 percent by physicians, and 10 percent practice independently. The remainderof CRNAs are employed by the military or work under other arrangements.We considered the following two sources of earnings data in establishingthe fee schedule for medically-directed CRNAs and nonmedically-directedCRNAs:andbullet; The annual earnings membership surveys conducted by AANA (themost recent survey reflects 1986 calendar year practice and income characteristics).andbullet; A special survey of hospitals claiming CRNA pass-through costsconducted by our fiscal intermediaries during the first quarter of 1988.The HCFA survey obtained information from hospitals on total hours anddirect anesthesia hours reported by CRNAs during the hospital's cost reportingperiod beginning in Federal fiscal year 1985.We have chosen to use the AANA survey data because it separates data basedon whether a CRNA is or is not medically directed. The HCFA survey didnot capture this information. While HCFA's results on the national averageearnings for hospital-employed CRNAs on a per case basis were similar tothe results of AANA's annual survey (HCFA's data were about 10 percenthigher), wide variations at the State level indicate that the AANA surveyresults are preferable in establishing State-level rates. The AANA surveydata distinguish, at the State level, between medically-directed CRNAsand nonmedically-directed CRNAs.We believe the AANA survey data are valid and reliable because_andbullet; We have no reason to believe there is any bias in the survey resultsparticularly since the survey was not conducted for the purpose of constructinga fee schedule, but rather is an ongoing annual membership survey; andandbullet; At a national level, after adjusting for fringe benefits, thedata are comparable (actually lower) to HCFA's results.In using the AANA salary survey to develop the State-level fee schedulefor medically-directed CRNAs, certain adjustments were made, as describedbelow.Step 1. Updating the 1986 Earnings to 1989 Level_Data from AANA's AnnualMembership Surveys show that the national average annual rate of increasein CRNA salaries from 1982 through 1986 was approximately six percent.We are proposing to use this rate of change to approximate the rate ofincrease in CRNA salaries through 1989. Projecting this rate of changethrough 1989 would require an increase of 19 percent (that is, 1.06 andmultiply;1.06 andmultiply; 1.06) over 1986 average earnings.Step 2. Fringe Benefit Adjustments_The value of fringe benefits is notreported on the AANA survey. Fringe benefits include items such as thevalue of pension costs, FICA taxes, and employee health insurance. (Wenote that the value of vacation, sick, and holiday time is included inthe survey's reported salary amounts.) We are proposing to use 20 percentof the 1986 national average salary or income of CRNAs as a reasonableapproximation of the costs of fringe benefits incurred by hospitals fortheir CRNA employees. This is the fringe benefit factor that was initiallyused in determining the costs to hospitals for the services of nonphysiciananesthetists furnished on or after October 1, 1984. (See the August 31,1984 prospective payment system final rule (49 FR 34794).) Step 3. Billing Costs_We believe an allowance should be made for the billingcosts that will be incurred by CRNAs or their employers (that is, hospitals)who must now begin to separately identify and bill the Part B carrier forCRNA services. Based on estimates of billing costs provided by AANA fromcosts incurred by independently practicing CRNAs that bill non-Medicarepatients, we are proposing to increase salaries and fringe benefits byseven percent to account for billing costs. Step 4. Constructing a Conversion Factor_The annual earnings figures resultingfrom the adjustment in Steps 1 through 3 above were translated into a conversionfactor by_ andbullet; Dividing the adjusted average annual CRNA compensation by theaverage annual anesthesia case load performed by a full-time medically-directedCRNA (649 cases) to derive average per case earnings; and andbullet; Dividing this figure by the average of 11.6 units per case (thetotal of average time and base units per case) to compute a conversionfactor. The average case load of 649 anesthetics was reported in the 1986 AANAsurvey. The Center for Health Economics Research (CHER), a private nonprofithealth care research organization, furnished us with the following information:andbullet; The average number of base and time units per case (that is, Medicareand non-Medicare) involving a CRNA (11.6 units). andbullet; The average number of base and time units per Medicare case involvingan anesthesiologist who medically directs his or her CRNA employees (12.1units). andbullet; The average time per Medicare case involving an anesthesiologistwho directs his or her CRNA employees (101 minutes). The latter two items (12.1 units and 101 minutes) are used in AppendixB of this document to compute conversion factors for physician-employedmedically-directed CRNAs. The CHER statistics were calculated from data collected during the fallof 1986 as part of the Anesthesia Practice Survey. The purpose of thissurvey was to gather information on the practice patterns and case-mixcharacteristics of CRNAs and anesthesiologists. The Anesthesia PracticeSurvey was designed by CHER and funded under a cooperative agreement withHCFA. Separate samples of CRNAs and anesthesiologists were selected for the AnesthesiaPractice Survey. Each was a proportional random sample, stratified by regionaland urban/rural location, to ensure an adequate geographic representation.Overall, 529 anesthesiologists and 520 CRNAs were interviewed. An alternative data source we considered was a survey on anesthesia casesconducted by the accounting firm of Touche Ross for AANA during the firstquarter of 1988. The Touche Ross survey estimated that the average numberof base and time units per anesthesia case involving a CRNA is 10.9 unitsand the average number of base and time units per Medicare anesthesia caseinvolving a CRNA is 11.3 units. We are not proposing to use the ToucheRoss data since they are limited to eight hospitals and thus are not asrepresentative as the CHER data. Step 5. Malpractice Adjustment_The fee schedule conversion factor computedin Step 4 was further adjusted to reflect the cost of malpractice insuranceincurred by hospitals for their CRNA employees. Data on State malpracticepremiums for CRNAs were used for this purpose. The State-level malpracticepremiums were obtained from St. Paul Fire and Marine Insurance Company,the largest carrier of malpractice insurance for CRNAs. We computed a State-levelmalpractice premium per unit by dividing the current State-level malpracticepremium by the product of the national average number of anesthetics administeredby CRNAs and the average total units per case. The malpractice adjustmentwas made after all the other adjustments because it reflects current malpracticerates. The conversion factors that result from these computations are set forthin Appendix A. The following example illustrates the application of themethodology as described in Steps 1 through 5 to calculate the medically-directedhospital-employed CRNA rate for Alabama Example 1<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,tp0,s25,xs45</C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Average salary for 1986 for full time medically-directed hospital-employedCRNAs (Alabama)<D>$52,582.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Average number of anesthesia cases<D>649 cases.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Average number of base and time units per case involving CRNAs<D>11.6 units/case.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Total units (649 andmultiply; 11.6)<D>7,528 units.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1986 conversion factor ($52,582_7,528)<D>$6.98.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Adjustments for fringe benefits and billing costs ($6.98 andmultiply;1.20 andmultiply; 1.07)<D>$8.97.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Update adjustment ($8.97 andmultiply; 1.19)<D>$10.67.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Malpractice rate adjustment (Alabama)<D>$0.63.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1989 CRNA conversion factor ($10.67 + $0.63)<D>$11.30.</D></ITAG></ITAG>Another source of data used to establish the CRNA fee schedule is informationfrom physician-employed CRNA arrangements. As noted above, if a physicianemploys and medically directs a CRNA, two time units per hour approximatesMedicare's payment for the CRNA service. In Appendix B of this document,we list the CRNA rates for physician-employed CRNAs computed from the 1989participating physician prevailing charge conversion factors and the averagetime per case. The 1989 particpating physician prevailing charge conversionfactors represent a one percent increase over the comparable 1988 prevailingcharge conversion factors due to the provisions of section 4042 of Pub.L. 100-203 (section 1842(b)(4) of the Act), which provides for a one percentincrease in the Medicare economic index for physicians' services, otherthan services of primary care physicians, furnished on or after January1, 1989. The following example illustrates the calculation of the physician-employedmedically-directed CRNA rate for Alabama.  <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,i1,s20,xs48  </C><T4>Example</T4> 2<H1> </H1><H1> </H1>  <ITAG tagnum="1">Average time per medically-directed case<D>101 minutes.  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Average time and base units per Medicare case<D>12.1 units.  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1989 weighted average prevailing charge conversion factor for participatinganesthesiologists in Alabama<D>$12.90.  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Conversion factor for medically-directed physician-employed CRNAs ($12.90andmultiply;101/30)/(12.1)<D>$3.59.</D></ITAG></ITAG>  Because of differences in program payments between physician-employed andhospital-employed CRNAs whose services are medically directed, we consideredestablishing two different State-level CRNA fee schedules for medically-directedCRNAs. However, we are not making such a proposal because we believe thatit could result in shifts in practice arrangements that would increaseprogram payments without any change in service quality. Moreover, as ageneral policy, we believe that the fee schedule payments for like servicesshould be the same and should not vary according to employment arrangements. We also considered setting a single State-level rate for medically-directedCRNAs (both hospital-employed and physician-employed) based on practicecosts of medically-directed hospital-employed CRNAs only. Under this approach,Medicare payments for CRNA services to physicians who employ and medicallydirect CRNAs would increase over the amounts previously recognized. However,this approach would be budget neutral with regard to the payments thatwould be made if CRNA services were paid as inpatient hospital services.Overall, however, Medicare payment for CRNA services would increase. Tomaintain overall budget neutrality, we estimate that all anesthesiologists'medical direction payments would need to be reduced by approximately 14percent if the fee schedule were based solely on practice costs of medically-directedhospital-employed CRNAs. Alternatively, if only medical direction paymentsfor anesthesiologists who medically direct their own CRNA employees wereaffected, the reduction would be approximately 30 percent. (We refer thereader to Appendix C for a detailed example of the medical-direction adjustment.) We do not believe that Congress envisioned adjustments to medical directionpayments of this magnitude when it enacted the CRNA fee schedule legislation,particularly the provisions of section 1833(l)(3)(B) of the Act. Moreover,as discussed above, Congress subsequently enacted reductions in anesthesiapayments for concurrent medically-directed procedures under section 4048of Pub. L. 100-203.  We also considered establishing a single rate by blending the hospitaland physician CRNA data weighted by the proportion of different employmentpractices. In blending hospital-employed and physician-employed CRNA rates,we would weight each portion of the rate because more CRNAs are employedby hospitals than are employed by physicians. Excluding CRNAs who are notmedically-directed, nationally, approximately 58 percent of medically-directedCRNAs are employed by hospitals and 42 percent are employed by physicians.These weights are based on data in AANA's 1986 Annual Survey pertainingto full-time CRNA practice arrangements. Weighting produces a single blendedState-level medically-directed CRNA rate that is estimated to be budgetneutral overall. However, the resultant rates are less than those basedsolely on data from medically-directed hospital employment practice arrangements.Under this proposal, no reduction would be made in physicians' medicaldirection payments. Collectively, hospitals that employ CRNAs whose servicesare medically directed would experience an 18 percent reduction in theirpayments for CRNAs. Medicare payments for anesthesia services furnishedby CRNAs who are employed and medically directed by an anesthesiologistwould increase by 45 percent. However, since the CRNA fee schedule paymentis made on an assignment-related basis, the CRNA fee schedule payment maybe less than the amount that the anesthesiologist could have collected,if the claim were not assigned, from the beneficiary.We also considered establishing a single rate by blending the hospitaland physician CRNA data by weights of 79 percent and 21 percent respectively.Under this option, reductions in the CRNA fee schedule would be incurredby hospitals and CRNAs and adjustments to medical direction allowanceswould be incurred by anesthesiologists. We estimate that hospitals thatemploy CRNAs whose services are medically directed would experience a ninepercent reduction in payments. Amounts for anesthesia services furnishedby CRNAs who are both employed and medically directed by physicians wouldincrease by 61 percent. To account for this increase in CRNA payments,medical direction allowances of all anesthesiologists would be reducedby seven percent. Set forth below is a table that shows the options forthe CRNA Fee Schedule/Medical Direction Adjustments:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s20,xs84</C> <H1>Level of CRNA Fee Schedule</H1><H1>Medical Direction Allowance Reduction</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">$9.90<D>14.0 percent.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">$9.00<D>7.0 percent.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">$8.10<D>0.0 percent. </D></ITAG></ITAG>We are proposing to establish a single blended rate that weighs medically-directedhospital-employed CRNA data at 58 percent and medically-directed physician-employedCRNA data at 42 percent. Adaption of this methodology results in no adjustmentbeing made to physicians' medical direction allowances.The results of the blended fee schedule for CRNAs working under the medicaldirection of an anesthesiologist are listed in Appendix D of this document.The following example illustrates the application of the blended rate methodologyfor Alabama.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,p0,7/8,i1,s20,xs44</C><T4>Example </T4>3<H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">National hospital-employed CRNA percentage <D>58 percent.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">National physician-employed CRNA percentage<D>42 percent.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospital-employed medically-directed CRNA rate (from example 1)<D>$11.30.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Physician-employed medically-directed CRNA rate (from example 2)<D>$3.59.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blended rate (.58x$11.30)+(.42x$3.59)<D>$8.06.</D></ITAG></ITAG>As mentioned above, section 4048 of Pub. L. 100-203 requires the Secretaryto develop a uniform relative value guide for determining reasonable chargesfor anesthesia services. This provision is being implemented through aseparate rulemaking document. Section 4048 of Pub. L. 100-203 requiresthat the uniform relative value guide be designed to ensure that Medicareprogram payments would not exceed the amount of payments that would otherwiseoccur. To achieve this result, carriers would need to adjust their prevailingcharge conversion factors. Because of this adjustment, it would be necessaryto recalculate medically-directed CRNA payment rates after the final ruleon the uniform relative value guide is published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>.<ITAG tagnum="81">3. CRNAs Who Are Not Medically-Directed</ITAG>AANA's 1986 annual membership survey collected data on State mean incomeand case load for CRNAs whose services are not medically-directed. In total,AANA collected data on 610 full-time CRNAs who are functioning withoutmedical direction by a physician. Two-thirds of those CRNAs are independentlypracticing while the remaining one-third are employed by hospitals. Thenumber of responses at the State-level was not sufficient to establishState-specific rates from the AANA data. Rather, we established the State-levelrate for CRNAs who are not medically directed by analyzing the relationshipbetween the national cost per case of full-time CRNAs who are not medicallydirected and full-time hospital-employed CRNAs who are medically-directed,and applying this ratio to the State-level rates for medically-directedCRNAs. The AANA data show that the average cost per case for full-timemedically-directed hospital-employed CRNAs and nonmedically-directed CRNAsare $72.00 and $105.00 respectively. Because of the budget neutrality provisionassociated with rural hospitals that apply for reasonable cost paymentsfor CRNAs, it was necessary that we adjust the nonmedically-directed rate.After this adjustment (See discussion below in section III. D. of thispreamble), the nonmedically-directed cost per case was reduced to $99.00.The nonmedically-directed CRNA cost per case is 37.5 percent greater thanthe hospital-employed medically-directed CRNA cost per case.The proposed State-level conversion factors for nonmedically-directed CRNAs,which are listed in Appendix E of this document, reflect this 37.5 percentdifferential (that is, the factors in Appendix E equal the factors in AppendixA multiplied by 37.5).D. Continuation of Reasonable Cost Payments for Rural HospitalsSection 9320 of Pub. L. 99-509 was amended by section 608(c) of Pub. L.100-485 to allow certain hospitals located in rural areas to continue tobe reimbursed on a reasonable cost basis for CRNA services during calendaryears 1989, 1990, and 1991. To qualify in 1989, a rural hospital must establishbefore April 1, 1989 to the satisfaction of the Secretary that_andbullet; As of January 1, 1988, it employed or contracted with a CRNA butnot more than one full-time equivalent CRNA;andbullet; In 1987, it had a volume of 250 or fewer surgical procedures,including inpatient and outpatient procedures, requiring anesthesia services;andandbullet; Each CRNA employed by or under contract with the hospital hasagreed not to bill under Medicare Part B for professional services furnishedat the hospital.To qualify in 1990 or 1991, a rural hospital must establish before thebeginning of the respective calendar year that in the prior year it didnot furnish more than 250 surgical procedures, including inpatient andoutpatient procedures, requiring anesthesia services.We are proposing to define a full-time equivalent anesthetist as one ormore anesthetists who in total work no more than 2,080 hours per year.These hours represent total hours at the hospital and include time spentin furnishing anesthesia services to patients and general services to thehospital. We are also proposing to define ``surgical procedures requiringanesthesia services'' as those procedures in which the anesthesia is administeredand monitored by a qualified nonphysician anesthetist, a physician otherthan the primary surgeon, or an intern or resident.As required by section 9320(k) of Pub. L. 99-509 (as enacted by section608(c) of Pub. L. 100-485), a rural area would be defined in the same wayit is defined for purposes of the inpatient hospital prospective paymentsystem (that is, section 1886(d) of the Act). That definition is set forthat andSection;412.62(f) and provides that a rural area is any area outsideof a Metropolitan Statistical Area (MSA), a New England County MetropolitanStatistical Area, as defined by the Executive Office of Management andBudget, or the New England counties deemed to be parts of urban areas undersection 601(g) of the Social Security Amendments of 1983.Under section 1886(d)(8)(B) of the Act, hospitals in certain rural countiesadjacent to one or more MSAs are considered to be located in one of theadjacent MSAs if certain standards are met. (These requirements are explainedin greater detail in the September 30, 1988 final rule on the inpatienthospital prospective payment system (53 FR 38499).) Since for purposesof payment under section 1886(d) of the Act, these hospitals are no longerclassified as rural, we are proposing that these hospitals also would notqualify as rural hospitals under section 9320(k) of Pub. L. 99-509 andwould not be eligible to continue to receive reimbursement on a reasonablecost basis for CRNA service during 1989, 1990, and 1991.The legislation also requires that this provision be implemented so asto maintain budget neutrality consistent with section 1833(l)(3) of theAct. For purposes of budget neutrality, we assumed that hospitals in whichCRNAs are medically directed would not qualify for continuation of reasonablecost payments. We assumed that anesthesiologists who medically direct atleast two CRNAs would never furnish fewer than 125 medically directed proceduresper CRNA.We used the results of the HCFA survey described above to estimate thenumber of hospitals that would qualify for continuation of reasonable costpayments for CRNA services. From the HCFA survey data, we identified 531rural hospitals that could qualify for reasonable cost payments. (If weextrapolate this finding to all rural hospitals who claimed pass-throughcosts, we estimate that the total number of hospitals that would qualifyis 757.)The AANA provided us with data on the number of hospitals in which a CRNAwho is not medically directed practices full-time at only one hospital.This equals 610 hospitals. It was therefore necessary to identify whichof the 531 rural hospitals had one full-time equivalent CRNA who furnished250 or fewer cases in calendar year 1986 (that is, the year for which wehave AANA survey data). The criterion we established for identifying afull-time equivalent CRNA was a CRNA who reported working between 1500and 2500 total hours at the listed hospital on the HCFA survey and whoworked 400 or fewer hours of direct anesthesia time. (According to ourmethodology, 400 hours equates to 250 anesthesia cases.) Of the 531 ruralhospitals, we identified 43 hospitals or 8.1 percent of the total as qualifyingrural hospitals with one full-time equivalent CRNA.According to the AANA, the average number of anesthesia cases furnishedby a full-time CRNA who is not medically-directed is 541 and the average1986 salary/gross income is $57,021. The average cost per case of theseCRNAs is $105. We adjusted these numbers to account for the CRNAs who workfull-time at a rural hospital that is expected to apply for payment ona reasonable cost basis. Of the 610 listed, we estimate 49 (8.1 percent)will qualify and apply for reasonable cost payments. We estimate that theaverage number of anesthesia cases furnished by a qualifying rural hospitalwill be 159. This estimate is based on the average number of anesthesiacases determined from the direct anesthesia hours reported by the CRNAon the HCFA survey form. The revised average cost per case of nonmedically-directedCRNAs is $99.00, a 5.7 percent decrease.We will review the rural hospitals that elect reasonable costs for CRNAservices furnished in 1989 and make appropriate adjustments if necessary,in January 1990 to the conversion factors for CRNAs who are not medicallydirected. We will be unable to make those adjustments before January 1,1990 for the following reasons. As hospitals will have until April 1, 1989to make the election of reasonable cost reimbursement, we will not receivethe data on qualified rural hospitals until sometime after April 1, 1989.Also, any adjustments we might make will have to be first published asa notice in the Federal Register. We believe it would be most practicalto set forth all adjustments to the CRNA conversion factors that mightbe necessary in a single notice published just prior to the January 1,1990 update for CRNA conversion factors.E. Updating the Fee Schedule for Years After 1989For calendar years beginning with January 1, 1990, we would update theCRNA fee schedule by the percentage increase in the Medicare economic index,as required by section 1833(1)(2) of the Act. Section 1833(1)(3)(B) ofthe Act also requires the Secretary to adjust the CRNA fee schedules in1990 to ensure that Part B payments do not exceed what would have beenpaid if the CRNA fee schedules were not enacted. We would monitor expendituresfor CRNA services in 1989 to verify the accuracy of the estimates usedto construct the initial fee schedules and make appropriate changes, asnecessary, effective with anesthesia services furnished on or after January1, 1990.F. Relationship of Payment Under the Fee Schedule to Payment to Physiciansfor the Medical Direction of CRNAsFor services furnished on or after January 1, 1989, if a physician medicallydirects an anesthesia procedure involving CRNAs, the carrier would, indetermining the reasonable charge for the procedure, allow no more thanone time unit for each 30 minutes of anesthesia time. One time unit foreach 15 minutes would be allowed only if the physician personally performsthe anesthesia procedure. Consequently, if the physician medically directsconcurrent anesthesia procedures and is the employer of the CRNA, two separatepayments would be made to the physician, that is, a medical direction paymentfor the physician's service and a payment under the CRNA fee schedule forthe CRNA's service. Assignment is mandatory for the CRNA's service.We are proposing to amend andSection; 405.553 to revise the method of paymentto physicians who medically direct CRNAs.Under section 1833(l)(3)(B) of the Act, the Secretary may reduce eitherthe medical direction reasonable charge payment or the CRNA fee schedulepayment, or both, to ensure that the estimated total amount paid for medicaldirection and CRNA services in 1989 and 1990 do not exceed the amountsthat would have been paid if section 9320 of Pub. L. 99-509 had not beenenacted. As noted above, we are not proposing reductions in medical directionallowances.Under the statute, for services furnished during the twelve-month periodbeginning January 1, 1989, a physician may not charge the beneficiary morethan the limiting charge plus one-half of the amount by which the physician'sactual charges for the service for the previous 12-month period exceedsthe limiting charge. The limiting charge is 125 percent of the prevailingcharge for the service after the medical direction adjustment. Since weare not proposing to adjust physician medical direction allowances, thespecial charge limit would not apply.G. Supervision of CRNAs by Physicians Other Than AnesthesiologistsIn the preamble to the March 2, 1983 final rule entitled, ``Payment forPhysician Services Furnished in Hospitals, Skilled Nursing Facilities,and Comprehensive Outpatient Rehabilitation Facilities,'' we noted thatanesthesia payment rules apply to any physician who furnishes, directs,or supervises anesthesia services regardless of the physician's practicespecialization or board certification (48 FR 8926). The preamble to thatdocument also noted that the directing physician frequently is the surgeonwho is performing the surgical procedure for which the anesthesia is required.Thus, in some hospitals and ambulatory settings, we have recognized thepractice in which the surgeon assumes responsibility for direction of theanesthesia service.Actual carrier practice for paying surgeons who medically direct CRNAsvaries. Some carriers include a payment for the surgeon's anesthesia serviceswith the surgical service allowance. Other carriers pay a separate amountfor the surgeon's anesthesia service.In a 1987 HCFA survey of carrier medical consultants concerning the proprietyof the surgeons' anesthesia practice patterns, the overwhelming consensusof the carriers' medical directors was that a surgeon cannot appropriatelyprovide the level of oversight needed to medically direct a CRNA and alsoperform surgery. We also believe that a surgeon cannot perform all theactivities required for anesthesiology services related to medical directionunder andSection; 405.552, while concurrently performing surgery. For example,andSection; 405.552(a)(2) specifically requires that a physician involvedin medical direction not perform any other services, such as surgery, whilethe physician is involved in medical direction. This requirement couldnot be met by a surgeon who is performing an operative procedure. Therefore,we are proposing that, effective January 1, 1989, medical direction paymentscould not be made to a surgeon who concurrently supervises CRNAs and performssurgery. The payment of a separate reasonable charge for medical directionof anesthesia services is not a widespread practice. We note, however,that to the extent a surgeon employs or contracts with a CRNA, the surgeonis entitled to receive the CRNA fee schedule payment, effective on or afterJanuary 1, 1989, for services the CRNA furnishes.We recognize that State law may require a surgeon to supervise the servicesof a CRNA while surgery is performed, and that this supervision is explicitlypermitted under the hospital conditions of participation at andSection; 482.52(a)(4)and the conditions for coverage of ambulatory surgical services at andSection;416.42(b)(2). However, we believe that it would be inappropriate to payfor such services of a surgeon as medical direction because we believethe requirements of andSection; 405.552 would not be met. The oversight ofa CRNA's services by a surgeon is, in our view, a quality control functionthat represents a service to the provider of the type described in andSection;405.480(a) or an ambulatory surgical center facility service.We also recognize that CRNAs provide anesthesia services associated withtherapeutic services, such as electroshock therapy, and anesthesia servicesassociated with diagnostic radiology services, such as magnetic resonanceimaging and computerized axial tomography scans. We are proposing thatmedical direction payments not be made to a radiologist or psychiatristwho furnishes nominal supervision of the anesthesia services since we donot believe these services meet the medical direction requirements underandSection; 405.552. As in the case of supervision of anesthesia servicesby the operating surgeon, oversight of anesthesia required for electroshocktherapy or diagnostic radiology, when furnished in a provider setting,represents a service to the provider.H. Other Conforming Regulations ChangesSection 1833(l)(5)(C) of the Act requires that a hospital that files aclaim or a request for payment for the services of a CRNA may not use anyuncollected coinsurance amount for a CRNA service as a bad debt. We areproposing to revise andSection; 413.80 to implement this provision.I. Related Care Furnished by CRNAsAnesthesiologists furnish specialized forms of monitoring, such as theinsertion of intra-arterial lines, central venous pressure lines, and SwanGanz catheters during surgical procedures. The majority of carriers recognizeseparate payments for these services in addition to payment for the anesthesiaservice. Also, anesthesiologists provide other services, such as pain managementservices, for which the carriers recognize separate payments. CRNAs alsofurnish specialized monitoring activities and other services not directlyconnected to the anesthesia service associated with the surgical service.We are not recognizing additional payments for these services because paymentfor these services has been factored in the CRNA conversion factor rates.As noted, we used salary/income data from the AANA that reflects paymentfor all anesthesia and related charge services. If we recognized separatepayments for these services, we would be allowing duplicate payments.<ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Regulatory Impact Statement</ITAG>A. Executive Order 12291Executive Order 12291 (E.O. 12291) requires us to prepare and publish aregulatory impact analysis for any proposed rule that meets one of theE.O. criteria for a ``major rule''; that is, that will be likely to resultin_andbullet; An annual effect on the economy of $100 million or more;andbullet; A major increase in costs or prices for consumers, individualindustries, Federal, State, or local government agencies, or geographicregions; orandbullet; Significant adverse effects on competition, employment, investment,productivity, innovation, or on the ability of United States-based enterprisesto compete with foreign-based enterprises in domestic or export markets.Pub. L. 99-509 adds section 1833(1)(3)(B) of the Act which provides thatthe Secretary must reduce the prevailing charges of physicians for medicaldirection of CRNAs, or the fee schedule amount, or both, to the extentnecessary to ensure that the estimated total amount that will be paid forCRNA services, plus the applicable coinsurance amounts, will not exceedthe total amount that would have been paid absent this provision.In section III.C. of this document, we explain how our proposed paymentmethodology would maintain the same payment levels, in the aggregate, toCRNAs, hospitals, and physicians that they would have received under thepresent payment methodologies. Because we would maintain budget neutralitywith respect to these payments, we do not expect any aggregate economicimpact that would meet any of the E.O 12291 criteria to result from thisproposed rule. Therefore, we have not prepared an initial regulatory impactanalysis.B. Regulatory Flexibility ActWe generally prepare a regulatory flexibility analysis that is consistentwith the Regulatory Flexibility Act (RFA) (5 U.S.C. 601 through 612) unlessthe Secretary certifies that a proposed rule would not have a significanteconomic impact on a substantial number of small entities. For purposesof the RFA, we do not consider individuals or State to be small entities,but we do consider hospitals, physicians, and CRNAs to be small entities.We are preparing an initial regulatory flexibility analysis for this proposedrule because of the large number of hospitals, physicians, and CRNAs thatcould potentially be affected, and the significance and potential controversyof these provisions.Section 1102(b) of the Act requires the Secretary to prepare a regulatoryimpact analysis if a proposed rule may have a significant impact on theoperations of a substantial number of small rural hospitals. Such an analysismust conform to the provisions of section 603 of the RFA. For purposesof section 1102(b) of the Act, we define a small rural hospital as a hospitalwith fewer than 50 beds located of a Metropolitan Statistical Area.We are not preparing a rural hospital impact statement since we have determined,and the Secretary certifies, that this proposed rule would not have a significanteconomic impact on the operations of a substantial number of small ruralhospitals.<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Fee Schedule Methodology</ITAG>We are proposing to establish the CRNA fee schedule for medically-directedCRNAs by blending the amounts paid to hospitals for their employee CRNAswith estimated Part B payments for CRNAs employed by physicians. The blendedrate would be established by weighting the hospital rate by 0.58 and thephysician rate by 0.42. This would result in an 18 percent reduction inMedicare payments to hospitals for CRNA services. Medical direction paymentswould not be made to a surgeon who concurrently supervises CRNAs and performssurgery.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Impact on Hospitals</ITAG>According to fiscal year 1985 cost reports, 2,750 hospitals claimed reasonablecosts for servics furnished by CRNAs. Of that number, 64 percent were ruralhospitals and 36 percent were urban hospitals.Section 608(c) of Pub. L. 100-485 allows qualified rural hospitals to continueto be paid on a reasonable cost basis for CRNA services. To qualify, therural hospital_andbullet; Must have employed or contracted with a CRNA, but not more thanone full-time equivalent CRNA, as of January 1, 1988; andandbullet; Must have had a volume of 250 or less surgical procedures, includinginpatient and outpatient procedures, requiring anesthesia services in 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">In addition, each CRNA employed by or under contract with the hospitalmust have agreed not to bill under Part B for professional services furnishedat the hospital. We estimate that almost 760 rural hospitals will qualifyunder this provision.Hospitals who employ CRNAs whose services are medically directed by anesthesiologistswould experience an 18 percent reduction in payments for CRNA services.These hospitals may continue to bill for services of CRNAs and experiencethis loss. Others may transfer the risk in payment reductions associatedwith the CRNA fee schedule to CRNAs by reducing their payments to CRNAsfor services. Still other hospitals may choose to end the CRNAs' employmentrelationship with the hospital and allow the CRNAs to bill directly. Theamount by which a hospital is able to reduce its payment to CRNAs for services,the hospital's Medicare patient volume, and the degree that the hospitalwishes to exercise control over its CRNAs would be among the factors thatultimately determine whether hospitals continue to employ CRNAs and billfor CRNA services.<ITAG tagnum="81">3. Impact on Physicians</ITAG>a. <T3>Anesthesiologists. </T3>Under this proposed rule, anesthesiologistswho medically direct CRNAs would not experience any reduction in Medicaremedical direction allowances.b. <T3>Surgeons. </T3>Under this proposed rule, medical direction paymentswould not be made to a surgeon who concurrently supervises CRNAs and performssurgery. The payment of a separate reasonable charge for medical directionanesthesia services is not a widespread practice. Thus, we believe thatonly a small number of practicing surgeons would be affected by this change.We do not have data available as to their number or the specific reductionin payments that would result from this change. We note that to the extenta surgeon employs or contracts with a CRNA, the surgeon is entitled toreceived the CRNA fee schedule payment, effective on or after January 1,1989, for services the CRNA furnishes.<ITAG tagnum="81">4. Impact on CRNAs</ITAG>As noted in section III.C, of this preamble, no reduction would be madein physicians' medical direction payments while hospitals who employ CRNAs,collectively, would experience an 18 percent reduction in their paymentsfor CRNAs. The effect of the 18 percent reduction on the hospital-employedCRNAs is discussed in section B.2, of this impact statement.Currently, hospitals that use independently-practicing CRNAs who are notmedically directed are paid on a reasonable cost basis. Under this proposedrule, hospitals or CRNAs would be paid on the basis of nonmedically-directedpayment rates. These rates are based on data supplied by the AANA or CRNAswhose services are not medically directed. Thus, the rates are designedto approximate current hospital costs of obtaining the service of CRNAscontracting independently.<ITAG tagnum="81">5. Alternatives Considered</ITAG>Section III.C, of this preamble includes a complete discussion of the alternativesconsidered and explanations of why those alternatives were not chosen.<ITAG tagnum="84">V. Other Required Information</ITAG>A. Public CommentsBecause of the large number of items of correspondence that we normallyreceive on a proposed rule, we are not able to acknowledge or respond tothem individually. However, we will consider all comments that we receiveby the date and time specified in the ``Date'' section of this preamble,and we will repsond to the comments in the preamble to the final rule.B. Effective Date of the Fee ScheduleSection 9320 of Pub. L. 99-509 requires that we implement a fee schedulefor CRNAs effective with services furnished on or after January 1, 1989.However, we are first publishing the fee schedule in proposed form to allowfull public participation and comment before publication of the final feeschedule. Since we will not publish the final fee schedule before the statutorilyrequired effective date of January 1, 1989, we have issued a program instructionto our Medicare carriers describing the interim procedures for paymentfor CRNA services effective January 1, 1989. We plan to issue the final rule on the fee schedule for the services ofCRNAs as soon as possible following the end of the comment period and ourevaluation and consideration of the comments we receive. When we do publishthe final fee schedule, it will be retroactively applied to all servicesfurnished on or after January 1, 1989. C. Paperwork Reduction Act This proposed rule contains no information collection requirements; therefore,it does not come under the provisions of the Paperwork Reduction Act of1980 (44 U.S.C. 3501 through 3511). <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects </ITAG>42 CFR Part 405 Administrative practice and procedure, Health facilities, Health professions,Kidney diseases, Laboratories, Medicare, Nursing homes, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements, Rural areas, X-rays. 42 CFR Part 410 Health facilities, Health professions, Kidney diseases, Laboratories, Medicare,Rural areas, X-rays. 42 CFR Part 412 Health facilities, Medicare, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.42 CFR Part 413 Health facilities, kidney diseases, Medicare, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements. 42 CFR Part 482 Hospitals, Medicaid, Medicare, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.42 CFR Chapter IV would be amended as set forth below: <ITAG tagnum="76">CHAPTER IV_HEALTH CARE FINANCING ADMINISTRATION, DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHAND HUMAN SERVICES </ITAG>I. Part 405, Subpart E is amended as follows: <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 405_FEDERAL HEALTH INSURANCE FOR THE AGED AND DISABLED </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart E_Criteria for Determination of Reasonable Charges; Reimbursementfor Services of Hospital Interns, Residents, and Supervising Physicians</ITAG>A. The authority citation for Subpart E is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 1102, 1814(b), 1832, 1833(a), 1842 (b) and (h),1861 (b) and (v), 1862(a)(14), 1866(a), 1871, 1881, 1886, and 1887 of theSocial Security Act as amended (42 U.S.C. 1302, 1395f(b), 1385k, 1395l(a),1395u (b) and (h), 1395x (b) and (v), 1395(a)(14), 1395cc(a), 1395hh, 1395rr,1395ww, and 1395xx).</ITAG>B. In andSection; 405.502, the introductory text of paragraph (a) is republishedand a new paragraph (a)(11) is added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 405.502 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Criteria for determining reasonable charges. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Criteria. </T3>The law allows for flexibility in the determinationof reasonable charges to accommodate reimbursement to the various waysin which health services are furnished and charged for. The criteria fordetermining what charges are reasonable include: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(11) In the case of services furnished by a certified registered nurseanesthethist or an anesthesiologist assistant, payment is made, after thePart B deductible is met, based on 80 percent of the least of the_(i) Actual charge; (ii) Prevailing charge that would be recognized if the services had beenperformed by an anesthesiologist; or (iii) Fee schedule amount, as described in andSection; 405.553. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>C. Section 405.553 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;405.553 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reasonable charges for anesthesiology services.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General rules.</T3>(1) In determining reasonable charge payment for anesthesiology servicesthat meet the conditions in andSection;405.552(a), the carrier applies theprovisions in paragraph (b) of this section for physicians and the provisionsin paragraph (c) of this section for anesthetists, as defined in andSection;410.66of this chapter.(2) Payment is made for anesthesia services furnished by the followingindividuals:(i) A physician with or without the assistance of an anesthetist.(ii) An anesthetist receiving medical direction who is employed by, orunder contract to_(A) A physician;(B) A hospital; or(C) An ambulatory surgical center.(iii) An anesthetist who furnishes anesthesia services or related carewithout medical direction.(3) In determining reasonable charges for anesthesia services furnishedby a physician, the carrier allows for the following time units, beginningfrom the time the physician or anesthetist begins to prepare the patientfor induction of anesthesia, and ending when the patient may be safelyplaced under postoperative supervision and the physician or anesthetistis no longer needed in attendance:(i) For services that are performed by a physician, including cases inwhich both an anesthetist and the physician furnish services to a singlepatient, no more than one time unit for each 15 minute interval, or fractionthereof.(ii) For services that are medically directed by a physician, no more thanone time unit for each 30 minute interval, or fraction thereof.(b) <T3>Services furnished by a physician. </T3>The carrier determines theamount of payment for physician anesthesia services under the reasonablecharge rules for physician services in providers set forth at andSection;405.551and the general reasonable charge rules set forth at andSection;andSection;405.501through 405.508.(c) <T3>Services furnished by anesthetists on or after January 1, 1989_</T3>(1)<T3>Amount of payment. </T3>For services furnished on or after January1, 1989, the carrier determines the amount of payment for anesthetist servicesbased on the least of the_(i) Actual charge;(ii) Prevailing charge that would be recognized if the service had beenperformed by a physician; or (iii) Fee schedule amount, which is the product of the applicable conversionfactor, as described in paragraphs (c)(2) through (c)(6) of this section,and the sum of the base and time units per case. For services involvingan anesthetist, the carrier allows no more than one time unit for each15 minute interval, or fraction thereof. (2) <T3>Fee schedules. </T3>HCFA establishes separate State-level fee schedulesfor_ (i) Anesthetists whose services are medically directed; and (ii) Anesthetists whose services are not medically directed. (3) <T3>Calculation of conversion factors for anesthetists who are medicallydirected_</T3>(i) <T3>Hospital-employed anesthetists. </T3>HCFA computes State-specific basesalary amounts for medically-directed hospital-employed anesthetists fromthe 1986 American Association of Nurse Anesthetists annual membership surveyas follows: (A) The base salary amounts are adjusted to reflect an allowance for fringebenefits and an allowance for billing costs, and updated by an inflationfactor to 1989. (B) The adjusted amounts are divided by the product of the estimated nationalaverage number of anesthesia cases furnished by a full-time medically-directedhospital-employed anesthetist and the estimated average number of baseand time units per anesthesia case. (C) HCFA computes State-specific amounts for malpractice expenses and addsthose amounts to the State-specific adjusted amounts derived in paragraph(c)(3)(i)(B) of this section. The resultant amounts are considered to beState-specific conversion factors for medically-directed hospital-employedanesthetists. (ii) <T3>Physician-employed anesthetists. </T3>HCFA computes State-specific conversion factors for medically-directedphysician-employed anesthetists as follows: (A) Multiply the locality prevailing charge conversion factor, as adjustedby the Medicare economic index, for anesthesia services of participatingphysicians by the average time per anesthesia case divided by 30 minutes.(If there are multiple localities within a State, or more than one carrierserves a State, a single, State-level weighted average participating physicianprevailing charge is applied.) (B) Divide the resulting amount by the average number of base and timeunits per anesthesia case involving a physician who medically directs andemploys the CRNA. (iii) <T3>Calculation of medically-directed conversion factors. </T3>The applicable State-specific conversion factors for anesthetists who aremedically directed are based on a blend of 58 percent of the hospital-employedconversion factor and 42 percent of the physician-employed conversion factorcalculated under paragraphs (c)(3)(i) and (c)(3)(ii) of this section, respectively.(4) <T3>Calculation of conversion factors for anesthetists who are not medicallydirected. </T3>The State-specific conversion factors for anesthetists who are not medicallydirected are derived from the State-specific medically-directed hospital-employedanesthetist conversion factors, as calculated in paragraph (c)(3)(i) ofthis section, multiplied by 137.5 percent. (5) <T3>Updating the fee schedules. </T3>For services furnished in calendar years after 1989, the fee schedulesapplicable to each year are the previous year's schedule updated by thepercentage increase in the Medicare economic index for that year. (6) <T3>Adjusting the fee schedules. </T3>The fee schedules may be adjusted for services furnished on or after January1, 1990 to reflect data that are more accurate than the data used to constructthe initial fee schedules. (7) <T3>Recipients of fee schedule payments. </T3>Fee schedule payments are made to the anesthetist who furnishes the service,or to a hospital, physician, or ambulatory surgical center with which theanesthetist has an employment or contractual arrangement that providesfor these payments to be made. II. Part 410 is amended as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 410_SUPPLEMENTARY MEDICAL INSURANCE (SMI) BENEFITS </ITAG>A. The authority citation for Part 410 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 1102, 1832, 1833, 1835, 1861(r), (s) and (cc),1871, and 1881 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1302, 1395k, 1395l,1395n, 1395x(r), (s) and (cc), 1395hh, and 1395rr) .</ITAG>B. In andSection; 410.10, the introductory text is republished, paragraph(o) is redesignated as paragraph (p), and a new paragraph (o) is addedto read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 410.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Medical and other health services: Includes services.</ITAG>Subject to the conditions and limitations specified in andSection;410.12,``medical and other health services'' includes the following services:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(o) Services of a certified registered nurse anesthetist or an anesthesiologistassistant.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>C. In andSection;410.12, the introductory text of paragraph (a) is republishedand paragraph (a)(2) is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;410.12</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Medical and other health services: Basic conditions and limitations.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Basic conditions.</T3> The medical and other health services specifiedin andSection;410.10 are covered by Medicare Part B only if they are notexcluded under Subpart C of Part 405 of this chapter, and if they meetthe following conditions:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(2) <T3>By whom the services must be furnished.</T3> The services must be furnishedby a facility or other entity as specified in andSection;andSection;410.14through 410.66.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>D. A new andSection;410.66 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;410.66</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Services of a certified registered nurse anesthetist or an anesthesiologistassistant: Basic rule and definitions.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Basic rule.</T3>Medicare Part B pays for anesthesia services and related care furnishedby a certified registered nurse anesthetist or an anesthesiologist assistantwho is legally authorized to perform the services by the State in whichthe services are furnished.(b) <T3>Definitions.</T3>For purposes of this part_<T3>``Anesthesiologist assistant''</T3> means a person who_(1) Is permitted by State law to administer anesthesia; and(2) Has successfully completed a six-year program for anesthesiologistassistants of which two years consist of specialized academic and clinicaltraining in anesthesia.<T3>``Anesthetist''</T3> includes both an anesthesiologist assistant anda certified registered nurse anesthetist.<T3>``Certified registered nurse anesthetist''</T3> means a registerednurse who is licensed by the State in which the nurse practices as a professionalregistered nurse and meets any other licensure requirements the State imposeswith respect to nonphysician anesthetists, and either_(1) Is currently certified by either the Council on Certification of NurseAnesthetists or the Council on Recertification of Nurse Anesthetists; or(2) Has graduated within the past 18 months from a nurse anesthesia programthat meets the standards of the Council on Accreditation of Nurse AnesthesiaEducational Programs and is awaiting initial certification.III. Part 412 is amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 412_PROSPECTIVE PAYMENT SYSTEM FOR INPATIENT HOSPITAL SERVICES</ITAG>A. the authority citation for Part 412 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 1102, 1122, 1815(e), 1871, and 1886 of the SocialSecurity Act (42 U.S.C. 1302, 1320a-1, 1395g(e), 1395hh, and 1395ww).</ITAG>B. In andSection;412.1, paragraph (a) is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;412.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope of part.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Purpose.</T3> This part implements section 1886(d) of the Act by establishinga prospective payment system for inpatient hospital services furnishedto Medicare beneficiaries in cost reporting periods beginning on or afterOctober 1, 1983. Under the prospective payment system, payment for theoperating costs of inpatient hospital services furnished by hospitals subjectto the system (generally, short-term, acute-care hospitals) is made onthe basis of prospectively determined rates and applied on a per dischargebasis. Payment for other costs related to inpatient hospital services (capital-relatedcosts, kidney acquisition costs incurred by hospitals with approved renaltransplantation centers, direct costs of medical education, and the costsof qualified nonphysician anesthetists' services, as described in andSection;412.113(c))is made on a reasonable cost basis. Additional payments are made for outliercases, bad debts, and indirect medical education costs. Under the prospectivepayment system, a hospital may keep the difference between its prospectivepayment rate and its operating costs incurred in furnishing inpatient services,and is at risk for operating costs that exceed its payment rate.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>C. In andSection;412.2, the introductory text of paragraph (d) is republishedand paragraph (d)(5) is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;412.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Basis of payment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) <T3>Excluded costs.</T3> The following inpatient hospital costs are excludedfrom the prospective payment amounts and paid for on a reasonable costbasis:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(5) The costs of qualified nonphysician anesthetists' services, as describedin andSection;412.113(c).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>D. In andSection; 412.71, the introductory text of paragraph (b) is republishedand paragraph (b)(8) is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 412.71</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Determination of base year costs</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) <T3>Modifications to base-year costs. </T3>Prior to determining the hospital-specificrate, the intermediary will adjust the hospital's estimated base-year inpatient operating costs, as necessary, to include malpractice insurancecosts as described in andSection; 413.55 of this chapter, and exclude thefollowing:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(8) The costs of qualified nonphysician anesthetists' services, as describedin andSection; 412.113(c).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>E. In andSection; 412.113, paragraph (c) is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 412.113</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Payments determined on a reasonable cost basis.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c)(1) <T3>Anesthesia services of hospital employed nonphysician anesthetists.</T3>For cost reporting periods beginning on or after October 1, 1984 throughany part of a cost reporting period occurring before January 1, 1989, paymentis determined on a reasonable cost basis for anesthesia services providedin the hospital by qualified nonphysician anesthetists (certified registerednurse anesthetists and anesthesiology assistants) employed by the hospitalor obtained under arrangements. (2)(i) For cost reporting periods, or any part of a cost reporting period,beginning on or after January 1, 1989 through any part of a cost reportingperiod occurring before January 1, 1992, payment is determined on a reasonablecost basis for anesthesia services provided in a hospital by qualifiednonphysician anesthetists employed by the hospital or obtained under arrangement,if the hospital demonstrates to its intermediary prior to April 1, 1989that it meets the following criteria: (A) The hospital is located in a rural area as defined in andSection; 412.62(f)and is not deemed to be located in an urban area under the provisions ofandSection; 412.64(b)(3). (B) The hospital must have employed or contracted with a qualified nonphysiciananesthetist, as defined in andSection; 410.66 of this chapter, as of January1, 1988 to perform anesthesia services in that hospital. The hospital mayemploy or contract with more than one anesthetist; however, the total numberof hours of service furnished by the anesthetists may not exceed 2,080hours per year. (C) The hospital must provide data for its entire patient population todemonstrate that, during calendar year 1987, its volume of surgical procedures(inpatient and outpatient) requiring anesthesia services did not exceed250 procedures. For purposes of this section, a ``surgical procedure requiringanesthesia services'' means a surgical procedure in which the anesthesiais administered and monitored by a qualified nonphysician anesthetist,a physician other than the primary surgeon, or an intern or resident. (D) Each qualified nonphysician anesthetist employed by or under contractwith the hospital has agreed in writing not to bill on a reasonable chargebasis for his or her patient care in that hospital. (ii) To maintain its eligibility for reasonable cost reimbursement underparagraph (c)(2)(i) of this section in calendar years 1990 and 1991, aqualified hospital must demonstrate prior to January 1 of each respectiveyear that for the prior year its volume of surgical procedures requiringanesthesia service did not exceed 250 procedures.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>IV. Part 413 is amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 413_PRINCIPLES OF REASONABLE COST REIMBURSEMENT; PAYMENT FOREND-STAGE RENAL DISEASE SERVICES </ITAG>A. The authority citation for Part 413 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 1102, 1122, 1814(b), 1815, 1833(a), 1861(v),1871, 1881, and 1886 of the Social Security Act as amended (42 U.S.C. 1302,1320a-1, 1395f(b), 1395g, 1395l(a), 1395x(v), 1395hh, 1395rr, and 1395ww).</ITAG>B. In andSection; 413.1, paragraph (b) is amended by changing the referencein the first sentence from ``paragraphs (c) through (e)'' to ``paragraphs(c) through (f)'' and a new paragraph (f) is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 413.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Introduction.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(f) <T3>Services of qualified nonphysician anesthetists. </T3>For cost reportingperiods, or any part of a cost reporting period, beginning on or afterJanuary 1, 1989, costs incurred for the services of qualified nonphysiciananesthetists are not reimbursed on a reasonable cost basis unless the provisionsof andSection; 412.113(c)(2) of this chapter apply. These services are paidunder the special rules set forth in andSection; 405.553 of this chapter.C. In andSection; 413.80, paragraph (a) is revised and a new paragraph (h)is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 413.80</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Bad debts, charity, and courtesy allowances. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Principle. </T3>Bad debts, charity, and courtesy allowances are deductionsfrom revenue and are not to be included in allowable cost; however, exceptfor anesthetists' services described under paragraph (h) of this section,bad debts attributable to the deductibles and coinsurance amounts are reimbursableunder the program.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(h) <T3>Exception. </T3>Bad debts arising from services for anesthetists paid under a fee schedule,as described in andSection; 405.553 of this chapter, are not reimbursableunder the program. V. Part 482 is amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 482_CONDITIONS OF PARTICIPATION FOR HOSPITALS </ITAG>A. The authority citation for Part 482 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 1102, 1814(a)(6), 1861 (e), (f), (k), (r), (v)(1)(G),and (z), 1864, 1871, 1883, 1886, 1902(a)(30), and 1905(a) of the SocialSecurity Act (42 U.S.C. 1302, 1395f(a)(6), 1395x (e), (f), (k), (r), (v)(1)(g),and (z), 1395aa, 1395hh, 1395tt, 1395ww, 1396a(a)(30), and 1396d(a)).</ITAG>B. In andSection; 482.52, the introductory text of paragraph (a) is republishedand paragraphs (a)(4) and (a)(5) are revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 482.52</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Condition of participation: Anesthesia services.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(a) <T3>Standard: Organization and staffing. </T3>The organization of anesthesiaservices must be appropriate to the scope of the services offered. Anesthesiamust be administered by only_<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(4) A certified registered nurse anesthetist (CRNA), as defined in andSection;410.66(b) of this chapter, who is under the supervision of the operatingpractitioner or of an anesthesiologist who is immediately available ifneeded; or (5) An anesthesiology assistant, as defined in andSection; 410.66(b) of thischapter, who is under the direct supervision of an anesthesiologist whois physically present.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Catalog of Federal Domestic Assistance Programs No. 13.773, Medicare_HospitalInsurance; and No. 13.774, Medicare_Supplementary Medical Insurance)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: January 6, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">William L. Roper,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator, Health Care Financing Administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Approved: January 17, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Otis R. Bowen,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Appendix A_Conversion Factors for Hospital-Based Medically-DirectedCRNAs </T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[in dollars]</ITAG><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Alaska<D>13.48</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Alabama<D>11.30</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Arizona<D>10.17</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Arkansas<D>9.84</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">California<D>12.18</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Colorado<D>9.67</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Connecticut<D>10.62</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Delaware<D>9.62</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">District of Columbia<D>9.02</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Florida<D>11.14</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Georgia<D>10.69</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hawaii<D>10.51</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Idaho<D>7.34</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Illinois<D>12.34</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Indiana<D>11.57</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Iowa<D>10.30</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Kansas<D>9.28</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Kentucky<D>9.96</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Louisiana<D>10.86</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maine<D>8.61</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maryland<D>9.42</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Massachusetts<D>9.20</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Michigan<D>11.28</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Minnesota<D>9.57</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Mississippi<D>(\1\)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Missouri<D>11.80</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Montana<D>12.12</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nebraska<D>10.97</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nevada<D>12.08</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">New Hampshire<D>9.62</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">New Jersey<D>10.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">New Mexico<D>9.33</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">New York<D>10.46</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">North Carolina<D>9.29</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">North Dakota<D>9.98</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Ohio<D>11.56</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Oklahoma<D>9.58</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Oregon<D>10.15</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Pennsylvania<D>8.59</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rhode Island<D>9.90</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">South Carolina<D>9.58</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">South Dakota<D>11.05</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Tennessee<D>11.87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Texas<D>12.06</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Utah<D>10.72</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Virginia<D>9.62</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Vermont<D>8.23</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Washington<D>9.77</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">West Virginia<D>9.29</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Wisconsin<D>9.23</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Wyoming<D>13.77</D><F>\1\ The carrier for Mississippi uses a relative value guide for anesthesiaservices that is significantly different from other carrier relative valueguides. Its base unit values are significantly higher and its prevailingcharge conversion factor significantly lower than for other carriers. Becauseof this, we are unable to furnish a meaningful CRNA conversion factor forMississippi. We will provide a blended rate in the final rule based onthe premise that all carriers, including the Mississippi carrier, willhave calculated revised conversion factors to be used under the uniformrelative value guide for pricing anesthesia services furnished on or afterJanuary 1, 1989.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Appendix B_Conversion Factors for Physician-Employed Medically-DirectedCRNAs</T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[in dollars] \1\</ITAG><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Alaska<D>6.34</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Alabama<D>3.59</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Arizona<D>5.26</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Arkansas<D>4.10</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">California<D>6.59</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Colorado<D>4.92</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Connecticut<D>5.09</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Delaware<D>4.19</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">District of Columbia<D>5.18</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Florida<D>6.57</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Georgia<D>5.23</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hawaii<D>6.73</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Idaho<D>4.42</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Illinois<D>6.20</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Indiana<D>4.26</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Iowa<D>4.54</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Kansas<D>4.12</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Kentucky<D>4.65</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Louisiana<D>4.03</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maine<D>4.08</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maryland<D>5.29</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Massachusetts<D>4.92</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Michigan<D>4.70</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Minnesota<D>4.26</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Mississippi<D>3.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Missouri<D>4.58</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Montana<D>5.98</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nebraska<D>5.04</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nevada<D>7.12</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">New Hampshire<D>3.76</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">New Jersey<D>5.82</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">New Mexico<D>5.59</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">New York<D>6.07</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">North Carolina<D>4.16</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">North Dakota<D>5.95</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Ohio<D>5.06</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Oklahoma<D>3.87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Oregon<D>4.42</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Pennsylvania<D>4.95</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rhode Island<D>3.87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">South Carolina<D>4.40</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">South Dakota<D>6.01</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Tennessee<D>4.42</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Texas<D>5.04</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Utah<D>5.65</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Virginia<D>4.31</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Vermont<D>3.76</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Washington<D>5.05</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">West Virginia<D>3.70</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Wisconsin<D>4.59</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Wyoming<D>4.42</D><F>\1\ This conversion factor is applicable in those cases in which ananesthesiologist employs and medically directs a CRNA. The conversion factorwas derived as follows: (1) We multiplied the 1989 State-level prevailingcharge conversion factor for participating anesthesiologists by the ratioof 101/30 to obtain the average CRNA payment per case. The average timefor an anesthesia procedure for a Medicare beneficiary is 101 minutes.Under the current system, the estimated payment for the physician employedCRNA service is one time unit per 30 minutes. (2) We divided the averagepayment per case by the average number of anesthesia units per case toobtain the CRNA conversion factor. The average number of anesthesia unitsper Medicare case is 12.1 units. (The average of 101 minutes and 12.1 unitsfor a Medicare anesthesia procedure were obtained from the CHER study,as discussed in the preamble to this document.)</F><F>An example of this calculation is provided for Alabama. The State level1989 prevailing charge conversion factor for participating anesthesiologistsin Alabama is $12.90. The estimated 1989 conversion factor for CRNA serviceswould be:</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/9,g1,t1,aw,10,4,22</C> <H1>($12.90 x </H1><H1>101)</H1><H2>30</H2><H1>-12.1=$3.59 per unit</H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><F>In States with more than one prevailing charge locality for anesthesiaservices or with multiple carriers, we computed the CRNA conversion factorby calculating weighted average State-level prevailing charge conversionfactors. These conversion factors are based on the carriers' current baseunit systems which vary. Section 4048 of Pub. L. 100-203 requires thatHCFA develop a uniform relative value guide to pay for anesthesia servicesfurnished on or after January 1, 1989. Expenditures under the uniform relativevalue guide must be no different than expenditures under the previous systems.To obtain this result, carrier prevailing charge conversion factors mustbe adjusted. In the final rule, we will advise the carriers how to calculatethe conversion factors for medically-directed CRNAs based on the adjustedprevailing charge conversion factors.</F></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/>   <ITAG tagnum="1">Curent system \1\<D>3.4x$20=$68.00</D><D>+</D><D>8.7x$20=$174.00</D><D>=</D><D>12.1x$20=$242.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Proposed schedule \2\ (CRNA's)<D>12.1x$9.90=$119.79</D><D>+</D><D>$242.00-$119.79=$122.21</D><D>=</D><D>Same as above $242.00</D><F>\1\ This is the combined and component pieces of the anesthesia paymentin which an anesthesiologist employs and medically directs CRNAs. Underthe current system, the average allowable anesthesia payment is estimatedat $242.00 or the product of 12.1 units per case multiplied by the nationalweighted average conversion factor of $20. This amount can be separatedinto two components, a CRNA payment and a medical direction payment. TheCRNA payment is based on the fact that the anesthesiologist receives twotime units per hour and the average time per Medicare case is 101 minutes.The medical direction payment represents the difference between the combinedpayment and the CRNA payment. </F><F>\2\ This is the combined and component pieces of the anesthesia paymentunder the system if only hospital data were used to establish the CRNAfee schedule. The first column of row 2 shows the CRNA fee schedule payment:12.1 units represent the average base and time units per Medicare anesthesiacase involving a CRNA; and $9.90 is the national weighted average computedfrom the rates in Appendix A. The second column shows the resultant medicaldirection payment. The medical direction payment decreases from $174.00under the current system to $122.21 under the proposed system, a 30 percentreduction. Thus, if only hospital data were used to establish the CRNAfee schedule, medical direction payments to physicians who employ CRNAswould be reduced 30 percent. If the payment reduction were applied to allanesthesiologists who medically direct CRNAs, the reduction would be 14percent. </F><F>Data from the American Society of Anesthesiologists and the Center forHealth Economic Research's Anesthesia Practice Survey show that the percentageof physicians who medically direct their employee CRNAs is 48 percent andthe percentage of physicians who medically direct other CRNAs is 52 percent.We assume that each group of physicians furnishes the same volume of cases.The reduction of 14 percent is derived from spreading the 30 percent reductionover all medically-directed cases as follows:</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,aw,9,1,xs35</C>  <H1/><T3>(.30)(48)</T3><H2>(52+48)</H2><H1>=</H1><H1>14 percent.</H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Appendix E_Blended Conversion Factors for Nonmedically-Directed CRNAs</T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[in dollars]</ITAG><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Alaska <D>10.48 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Alabama <D>8.06 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Arizona <D>8.11 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Arkansas <D>7.43 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">California <D>9.83 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Colorado <D>7.67 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Connecticut <D>8.30 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Delaware <D>7.34 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">District of Columbia <D>7.41 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Florida <D>9.22 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Georgia <D>8.39 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hawaii <D>8.92 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Idaho <D>6.11 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Illinois <D>9.76 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Indiana <D>8.50 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Iowa <D>7.88 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Kansas <D>7.11 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Kentucky <D>7.73 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Louisiana <D>7.99 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maine <D>6.71 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maryland <D>7.69 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Massachusetts <D>7.40 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Michigan <D>8.52 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Minnesota <D>7.34 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Mississippi <D>(\1\) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Missouri <D>8.77 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Montana <D>9.54 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nebraska <D>8.48 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nevada <D>10.00 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">New Hampshire <D>7.16 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">New Jersey <D>8.25 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">New Mexico <D>7.76 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">New York <D>8.62 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">North Carolina <D>7.14 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">North Dakota <D>8.29 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Ohio <D>8.83 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Oklahoma <D>7.18 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Oregon <D>7.74 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Pennsylvania <D>7.06 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rhode Island <D>7.37 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">South Carolina <D>7.41 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">South Dakota <D>8.93 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Tennessee <D>8.74 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Texas <D>9.11 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Utah <D>8.59 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Virginia <D>7.39 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Vermont <D>6.35 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Washington <D>7.79 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">West Virginia <D>6.94 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Wisconsin <D>7.28 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Wyoming <D>9.84 </D><F>\1\The carrier for Mississippi uses a relative value guide for anesthesiaservices that is significantly different from other carrier relative valueguides. Its base unit values are significantly higher and its prevailingcharge conversion factor significantly lower than for other carriers. Becauseof this, we are unable to furnish a meaningful CRNA conversion factorsfor Mississippi. We will provide a blended rate in the final rule basedon the premise that all carriers, including the Mississippi carrier, willhave calculated revised conversion factors to be used under the uniformrelative value guide for pricing anesthesia services furnished on or afterJanuary 1, 1989.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Appendix D_Blended Conversion Factors for Medically-Directed CRNAs</T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[in dollars]</ITAG><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Alaska <D>18.54 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Alabama <D>15.53 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Arizona <D>13.99 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Arkansas <D>13.53 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">California <D>16.75 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Colorado <D>13.30 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Connecticut <D>14.60 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Delaware <D>13.23 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">District of Columbia <D>12.41 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Florida <D>15.32 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Georgia <D>14.69 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hawaii <D>14.45 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Idaho <D>10.09 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Illinois <D>16.97 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Indiana <D>15.90 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Iowa <D>14.16 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Kansas <D>12.76 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Kentucky <D>13.70 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Louisiana <D>14.93 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maine <D>11.84 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maryland <D>12.95 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Massachusetts <D>12.65 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Michigan <D>15.52 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Minnesota <D>13.16 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Mississippi <D>(\1\) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Missouri <D>16.23 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Montana <D>16.67 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nebraska <D>15.08 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nevada <D>16.61 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">New Hampshire <D>13.23 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">New Jersey <D>13.76 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">New Mexico <D>12.83 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">New York <D>14.39 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">North Carolina <D>12.78 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">North Dakota <D>13.72 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Ohio <D>15.89 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Oklahoma <D>13.18 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Oregon <D>13.96 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Pennsylvania <D>11.81 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rhode Island <D>13.62 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">South Carolina <D>13.18 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">South Dakota <D>15.19 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Tennessee <D>16.32 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Texas <D>16.58 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Utah <D>14.74 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Virginia <D>13.23 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Vermont <D>11.32 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Washington <D>13.43 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">West Virginia <D>12.77 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Wisconsin <D>12.69 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Wyoming <D>18.93 </D><F>\1\The carrier for Mississippi uses a relative value guide for anesthesiaservices that is significantly different from other carrier relative valueguides. Its base unit values are significantly higher and its prevailingcharge conversion factor significantly lower than for other carriers. Becauseof this, we are unable to furnish a meaningful CRNA conversion factorsfor Mississippi. We will provide a blended rate in the final rule basedon the premise that all carriers, including the Mississippi carrier, willhave calculated revised conversion factors to be used under the uniformrelative value guide for pricing anesthesia services furnished on or afterJanuary 1, 1989.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-1693 Filed 1-25-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4120-01-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>